Wisconsin, session 2025, AB927.
do enact as follows:AB927,13Section 1. Renumbering and cross-reference changes under s. 13.92 4(1) (bm) 2., stats. Each statute listed in column A was renumbered to the statute 5number in column B, and cross-references to the renumbered statute were changed 6in the statutes listed in column C to agree with the renumbered statute, under 7section 13.92 (1) (bm) 2. of the statutes:Note: Confirms renumbering and corresponding cross-reference changes under s. 13.92 (1) (bm) 2. - See PDF for table AB927,2,11